Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2902
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 54-753.05 and 54-797 to 54-7,103 and the Animal Health and Disease Control Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 54-2903 to 54-2938 shall be used.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 2.